District of Columbia statutes.
24-241.02

Recommendations; order of court or Board of Parole required.

At the time of imposition of sentence, the probation officers of the court or the Director of the Department of Corrections, may recommend to, or the person sentenced may request, the sentencing court that such person be granted the privilege of work release. At any time subsequent to the imposition of sentence, the person sentenced may request the sentencing court or the Director of the Department of Corrections that such person be granted the privilege of work release. No person shall be given work release privileges except by order of the sentencing court or the Director of the Department of Corrections, or by order of the Board of Parole pursuant to § 24-241.01.

Nov. 10, 1966, 80 Stat. 1519, Pub. L. 89-803, § 3
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-202, § 6, 30 DCR 173
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 19(c), 44 DCR 1232
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-436, December 4, 1996, 43 DCR 6651), and see § 4(b) of the Zero Tolerance for Guns Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-35, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1928).
1973 Ed., § 24-462.
1981 Ed., § 24-462.